ope/plugins/com.oxygenxml.pdf.css/lib/oxygen-pdf-chemistry/config/hyph/de_1901.xml
<patterns>
.ab1a
.ab3l
.abo2
.ab3ol
.ab1or
.ack2
.ag2a
.ag4r
.ag2u
.ai2s
.akt2a
.al2e
.al3k
.al5l4en
.al4tei
.alt3s
.ampe4
.amt4s1
.an3d2
.anden6k
.and4ri
.ang2
.an3gli
.ang4s2
.angst3
.an3s2
.an4si.
.an4tag
.an3th
.an3z2
.aos4
.ap5p6le.
.aps2
.ari1e
.ark2a
.ar4m3ac
.ar2sc
.ar4t3ei
.arter4
.ar6t5erh
.as6sest
.as2t
.ata1
.at4h
.au3d
.au4f3
.aufs2
.au2s1
.ausch3
.au6stes
.ax2
.äm3
.är6schl
.ät2s
.äu3
.be3erb
.be3r2a
.be3r2e
.berg3a
.ber6gab
.ber6g5e6b
.ber4gl
.ber4g3r
.boge2
.bo4s3k
.bu4ser
.bus3se
.bu7s8ser.
.ch2
.chi3er
.dab4
.da2r1
.da4rin
.dar2m1
.da4te.
.da4tes
.de2al
.de1i
.de4in.
.de8ments
.de1o2
.de3r4en
.derma3
.dermas6
.de3sk
.dien2
.do2mo
.do1pe
.dorf1
.dü1b
.ebe2r1
.ehe1i
.ei4ds
.ei3e2
.ei4na
.einen6g
.ei2sp
.ei4s1t
.ei2tr
.eke2
.el2a
.el2bi
.em3m2
.en1
.en4d3er
.en5der.
.en2d3r
.en2gl
.enn2
.en2t3
.epi1
.ep3p
.er8brecht
.er2bu
.er2da
.er4dan
.er4dar
.er4dei
.erden6k
.er4der
.er1e
.ere3c
.erf4
.er1i
.ers2
.er8stein
.erster6
.er8sterb
.er8stritt.
.er8stritten.
.er4zen4
.esel4s
.es3p
.es2st
.es2t
.est4e
.est2h
.et2s
.eu1
.eu3g4
.eu3t
.eve4r
.ext4
.fe4i
.fer4no
.fe4sta
.fid2
.fi4le.
.fi4len
.fi2s
.flö8s7se.
.flö8s7sen.
.flö8sses
.fs4
.fu2sc
.ga2t
.gd2
.geb2l
.gel2d1
.ge5nar
.ge3n2e
.ge3r2a
.ge3r2e
.ge3s2
.get4
.ge3u
.grif8fes
.guss1
.haft3s
.hal2s
.hau2t1
.he2
.he3fe
.her3an
.he3ri
.he6r5inn
.hi4n
.hin3u
.ho4met
.ia2
.il3
.im2a
.ima4ge
.im5m2
.in1
.in3e
.in3gl
.ink4
.inn2e
.inu1
.ioni1
.ire3
.is2a
.ka2b5l
.ka2i
.kamp2
.ka4t3io
.ken6num
.ker3s
.ki4e
.kle4i
.kopf1
.ks2
.kus2
.le4ar
.lich8t7er8s
.li2f
.li4ve.
.lo4g3in
.lo3ver
.lö4ss
.lös3se
.lu4str
.ma3d
.ma3la
.mal4e
.ma4str
.md2
.mel2a
.me3no
.men8schl
.men8schw
.men3t4
.mi2t
.mi4ti
.mm2
.näs5c
.ni2e
.nob4
.no2c
.no2s
.no4th
.nul2
.nus2
.ob1a
.obe2
.ohr5s
.oper4
.or2a
.ort2
.orts3e
.ort4st
.os5t6alg
.oste2
.ost5end
.osten8de
.oste6re
.ost3r
.ozo4
.öl3l
.pa4r1e
.par3t4h
.pe2c
.pe4ste
.pf4
.ph2
.poka2
.po4str
.ps2
.rabe4
.ra3me
.ra4sp
.ra4s3s
.reb3s2
.re3cha
.rein4t
.reli1
.reli3e
.ri2as
.rich5te
.ro4a
.ro3m4a
.rö2s1c
.rö4ss
.rös3se
.runder6
.ru5s6ses
.rü1b
.rücker6
.rü4ss
.sali1
.sami3
.sas2
.sa3sse
.säs4
.sch4
.scho7s8se.
.scho7s8ses.
.sen3s
.ser2u
.se2t1
.sha2
.si2te
.ski1e
.spas4
.spä5s4
.spiege8lei
.st6
.sto4re
.stras4
.sucher6
.tan4k3l
.ta2to
.te2e
.te2f
.te3no
.th4
.ti2a
.tid1
.ti2e
.ti4me.
.ti4mes
.ti2s
.to4nin
.to4pl
.to2w
.tras3
.tra4ss
.tri3e4s
.ts2
.tu3ri
.uf2e2
.ufer1
.um3
.umo2
.ums2
.un3a2
.un3d
.une4
.un3g
.uni2t
.ur1
.ural4
.ur2i
.urin4s
.ur3o2m
.uro2p
.ur3s2
.ut2a
.ut3r
.übe4
.ve5n2e
.vi2e
.vo4r
.wah4l
.wa2s
.weg5s
.welter8e
.welter8k
.wi4e
.wor2
.wort5en6
.xe3
.ya4l
.zeit3s
.zel4la4
.zelle4
.zel6lei
.zi2e
.zin4st
.zol2
a1ab
aa2be
aa1c
aa2gr
2a1a2n
2a2ar
aa2r1a
aar3f4
aar3k4
aar5sc
aas1t
aa2th
aa2t3r
aat4s1
2a3au
a1ä
a1b
2aba
ab1auf
ab1ä
ab2äu
1abd
ab1eb
abe1e
ab1eil
4abel
abe2la
a3beri
ab1er2k
ab1er2r
ab1er2z
ab3esse
abes2t
ab1eß
2abet
2abew
1abf
3abfi
1abg
1abh
2abi
ab1ins
ab1ir
ab1it
1abk
ab1l
1a2bla
1a2blä
2able
ab4le.
ab3li
ab4lo
3a2blö
a2blu
abma3s
1abn
a2bo.
ab2of
1a2bon
2abor
ab3r
a3bra
a4brä
2abrü
1abs
2abs.
abs2a
2absar
ab3s2i
ab3s2p
abs4t2
2abst.
ab3sz
1abtei
2a3bu
ab1ur
2abü
1abw
2aby
1abz
2aca
2ac1c
a1cem
2ach.
ach1a
a1chal
ach3au
2achb
2a1che
a2ch1e2c
ach1ei
a4cherf
a4cherk
a4cherö
a4ch3erw
a1chi
ach3l
ach3m
ach3n
a1cho
a3cho.
ach1o2b
ach1or
ach3ö
ach3r
ach3s2i
ach3su
a4cht
acht7ersc
ach2t1o
ach8traum
ach8träume.
ach8träumen.
ach6trit
a1chu
ach1u2f
ach3ü
2achv
2ach1w
a1ci
ac1in
2ack.
ackmu4
ackmus3
ack2se
ack3sl
ack3sta4
a1cl
a3co
acon4n
2acu
a1ç
a1d
2ada.
a3d2ab
ad2ag
adai4
ada2m
ad3ama
a2d1an
3a4dap
a3d2ar3
4adav
1a2dä
ad1c
1add
2ade.
ade2al
adefi4
a2dein
2aden
ade1r2a
a2deri
4ades2
ade3sp
ades6s
2adf
2adh
4a3di
adi3en
5adj
2ado
ad2ob
2adp
2adq
2ad3rec
ad4res
2ads2
ad3sz
ad2t1
adta2
2adu
2a1e1
ae2b
a3e2d
a3e2i
a2ek
a3el.
a2ela
a2ele
a2eli
a3els
ae2o3
a3e2p
3a2er2o
ae4sc
a2et
a2ew
ae2x
af1a
a2fak
a2fan
a3far
af4at
a2fau4
2afe
a2f1ec
a2fent
af1erl
a2fex
af2fei
af2f3l
af4flu
2afi
2af3l
a2fö
af3ra
af3rä
af3re
af3rö
af3s2a
af2sp
2aft
af2t1a
af2tei
af4t3erl
af2t1o
af2t3r
aft5re
af2tur
a2f3ur
a1g
2aga
ag1a2b
ag1a2d
ag1am
ag1ar
ag1au
ag2di
ag2du
2age.
age1i
age4na
age4neb
a2gent
a4gentu
ag2er
age4ral
2ages
age2sa
age4sel
age4si
age2s3p
ages5s
ag3esse
age6stem
ag3gl
3aggr
3a2git
2a2gl
ag4la
a4glö
ag2n
a2gna
ag4ne.
ag4nu
a2g3re
a2g3ri
ag4ro
agsa2
ag3sah
ag4sam
ag3sc
ags3p
ag6spo
ag4sti
ag2s1tr
2agt
ag2th
a2gund
2ah.
2a1ha
ah4at
2a1he
ahe1in
a2h1erh
a1h2i
ahin3
ahl3a4
ah4l1ei
ah4l3erh
ah2lö
ahl3sz
ah4n1a
ahner4e
ahnt2
1ahor
ah1o2s
a2h3ö
ahr1a
ah3re
ahre4s3
ah3ri
ahrta4
ahr4tri
ah2ta
aht3h
ah2t5r
aht1s
a1hu
ah1w
a1hy
2ai
ai3a4
aian3
aid4s
aids1t
ai1e2
aif4
ai1fr
ai3g4
a3ik.
ai3ke
aik4r
ai2lo
aim2o
ain2a
a1ind
ain4e
a1ing
ain3sp
3airb
ai2sa
a3isch.
ai3s2e
aiss2
ais3sen
ais5st
ait4
a3iv.
a3ivl
a3ivs
a1j
ajekt4o
2ak.
1a2k4ad
2akal
2a3kam
2akar
ak4at
1a2kaz
2akb
2akc
2akd
2a1ke
a2kef
aken2n
a2keu
2a1ki
2ak3l
ak4li
4ako
2a1kr
ak3rau
3akro3
2aks
ak3sh
2akta
2aktb
ak3te
ak4tei
2aktik
ak2t3r
ak3t4ri
2aktsi
2aktst
2a1ku
a2kun
2a3kü
1akz
a1la
2a5la.
al1ab
ala3ch2
al1af
ala2g
al1age
a3lal
al1am
alami5
al3amp
al1ana
a2l1ang
al1ans
al1anz
a2lar
a3lar.
a3lare
al2arm
al3arr
ala2s
al1asi
al1ass
2alat
al1au
al3aug
a1lä
al1äm
alb3ein
al4berh
al4b3er4w
al2b1l
alb3li
al2boh
al2br
alb3ru
alb3s
al2dä
al2dr
2ale
ale4a
3a2l1e2b
3a4l1ef
a4l1eh
a2l1ei
a4lein
a2l1el
alen1
al3ends
a2leng
a3lentf
ale2p
al1epo
al1erf
a2l1erh
al3erl
3alerm
a2l1ert
3alerz
a2l1esk
ale4t
al1eta
al1eth
a2l1eu
a4leur
3a2lex
alf4r
3algi
al2gli
1algo
2ali
ali4ene
al2imb
ali4nal
al1ins
a2linv
alk1ar
al2kne
1alkoh
alk3s2
al2l1ab
alla3d
al2lan
al2l3a4r
al6later
al2län
al3läu
al4lec
alle4gi
al4leh
al5lein
al3lend
all5erfa
al3les
alle3se
al2leu
1allgä
alli5er.
alli7ers.
al2lob
al2lo2c
al2lo2k
al4lo2s
al2lö2
all3öse
al2luf
allu4s
al2lü4s
al4m3ast
3almb
2alo
a2l1o2b
3a2loe
alo2ga
al1orc
a2l1ö
al3öf
al2ös
3alpe.
1alph
al3skl
als2to
al2sum
al3sun
al4tak
al3tar
alt3eig
al4t3er3f
alt1op
al2tö
al2tri
alt3ric
al2tro
alt2se
alt4stü
a1lu
al2uf
a2lum
al1umb
al1ur
4aly
alzer4z
al2zw
2am.
2am2a
amab4
amad2
ama3g
2amä
am2e
2ame.
a2meb
2amel
am4e2n1
amer2a
am3erf
a2meri
ame3ru
a4mesh
a3met
a2mew
2amir
ami3t2a
ami3ti
2aml
2amm.
am2ma2c
2ammal
amma4n
am2mar
am2mas
amma4sc
am2maß
am4ma4te
am2mä
ammen8ge.
am2min
am2mit
2amml
am4mod
2ammt
ammu2
am4mü
amni1
a2mö
amp2fa2
am3pr
2ams
am4schl
1amt.
am2t1a
am2t1ä
am2tel
am4t3ern
am2tö
am2t3r
am2tu
2amu
2ana.
2anab
ana3c
anadi3
a3nak
an1alg
ana4lin
2anam
2anan
2anas
an1ath
an4atm
an1äs
1anb
2anbu
an3ch
2and.
3an3d2ac
an4d3ei
ande4sc
an2dex
an4drau
an2d3rü
and4sas
and6spas
and6s5paß
and2su
2andu
and1ur
2ane
an3ec
a3nee
an2ei.
an3eif
an1e4k
3a4n1erb
an1eth
1anf
2anfi
anft3s
an3f2u
4ang.
an2g1ar
3angeb
an2g1ei
an4g3erf
an4g3erl
an4gerw
an4g3erz
2angf
2angh
2angie
ang1l
an2gla
2ango
ang1r
an4g3ra
4angs.
ang3sc
ang6s3po
1anh
2a3ni
an2i3d
ani3els
ani5ers.
3a4nim
a4nins
2anj
2ank.
an2k1an
3ankä
an2kei
an3kl
an4klö
an2klu
an2k3no
ank1r
ank3ra
ank3rä
ankt4
1anl
anma3s2
1anmu
2ann
3an3na
ann2ab
3annä
an3n2e
ann4sto
an1od
a3nol
a2n1or
a3nos
2a1nö
1anr
1an3s2ä
1ansc
ans2en
an2seu
2ansk
an3skr
an3s1pa
1anspr
an3s2z
2ant.
an2t3a4r
1antá
1antei
3antenn
an3t4he
1anthr
2anto
anton4
3antr
ant3rin
an2tro
1antw
2a1nu
anu1s
a1nü
1anw
2anwet
2anzb
1anzei
anze2n
2anzg
an2z1i4n
2anzs
1anzü
2anzw
an2zwa
an2zwi
2ao
ao1i4
a1op
a1or
a1os3
ao3t2
a3ot.
a1ö
a1p
2ap.
2a3pa
2ape
a2pef
a3pel
a2pé
a2pf
ap2fa
a3pfl
a3phä
a2ph3t
2ap3l
ap4la
ap2n
a2pot
ap2pf
3appl
2apr
3apri
ap2str
2a3pu
2aq
2ar.
a1ra
a3ra.
ar2ab
ar3abt
ara3d2
a2r3al
a3ra3li
2aran
a2r1ang
a2r1ans
a2r1anz
a2r3app
2a2rar
a2r1au
a1rä
1arb
2arb.
4arba
ar2bau
ar2bec
2arbek
2arben
4arbi
ar2bl
2arbr
ar2bre
2arbs2
2arbt
2arbu
ar2b3un
1ar1c
ar2dro
2are
a2rea
ar1eff
a4reg
ar1ehr
a2rein
4arem
a3ren
4aren.
are3r2a
ar2erf
a2r1erh
a2reri
are3u
ar2ew
2arf
ar2fä
arf1r
ar2f3ra
ar2gl
ar2gn
ar3g4r
2arh
2a3ri
ar2ia
ari3e4n
ari3erd
ari3erg
ari5ers.
ar1im
arin3it
a4r1int
a4rinw
ar2kal
ark3amt
ar2k1ar
ark3aue
ar2k3l
ar4klag
ar2kor
ar4k3ri
ark3sa
ark3she
ar2les
2arma
ar3m2ä
ar3m2or
ar2nan
arn2e
2a1ro
ar1ob
a2r1o2d
a2r1of
a2r1op
a2ror
2arp
2arr
ar2r3ad
ar2rek
arre4n
ar2rh
arr3he
2arsa
ar4schl
arse3
ar3s2h
2arsi
ar3t2e
artel6li6
ar2the
artin2
2arto
ar4t3ram
art3re
2arts
2artuc
2aru
ar1uh
ar1um
a2rü
2arv
arwa2
2ary
ar2zä
2arze
1arzt
ar2z1w
as2ad
as1ala
asas2
asa3sse
as3au
asau2s1
a2sca
a4schec
asch3la
a2schm
a3schu
4a3s2e
a4seb
as3e2m
a5s4es
a4sex
2asg
4ash
a4s3ha
as4hi
asin2g
4a5sis
asi4st
a3skop
a4s3l
a4sn
a1so1
as1o2f
a3sol
as1or
as1p
aspek6to
a4s2ph
as2pi
a4spl
as2po
a1spu
as3s2a
ass2e
as2s3ei
as3sel
as3ser
asserma6
as3s2i
as2s1p
as4st
ass1ti
ass1to
as5str
as5stu
2asta
a4stec
a4s3tep
as2ter
a4stese
2astr
as4trau
a4strä
ast3räu
a2s2t3re
a4strol
a2stum
a3su
asu2s
a4sw
aswa2s
3a2syl
aße2
aßen3
2a1t
at1ab
at2a1f
at4ag
a2t1akt
ata3l
a3tam
at1apf
at1au
a2taus
a2tä
at1än
at2c
a2teb
ate1c
ateien4
at1eig
a4teli
at2en
a2tep
ate2ru
atex3
at2h
at3ha
athe1
3athl
a4thr
4a3ti
atingma5
3atm
4atmus
ato4man
4ator
a2t1ort
a2t1ö
4atr
atra4t
at3rä
at3re
at3rom
at3rü
at2sa
at4schn
at2se
at4set
at2si
ats1p
at3ta
3attac
at4tak
at2ta2l
att3ang
at4tau
at2tä
at4tec
at2tei
at3t4hä
at2t3rä
att3s
at3tu
atu2n
atz1er
at4zerk
at4zerw
at2zi
atz1in
at2zo
atz3t2
at2z1w
a2u
2au.
2au1a2
2aub
au2bab
aube4n
au2bli
au2blo
4auc
auch3ta
au2dr
2aue
aue2b
au3en.
au2ere
au5erein
auer3ö
au2fa
auf1an
3aufber
2aufe.
2aufeh
auf1er
au4ferk
auff4
3aufn
auft2
2auft.
2aug
4augeh
2auh
au3ha
au2hu
4au1i
au2is
2auj
aule2s
au3lü
2aum
au2mal
aum2ei
au2m1e4r1
aum3eri
au2m1o
aum3p2
aum3s2
4aun
au3n2a
aun2e
au4nei
au2nio
au1nu
a4unz
2aup2
aup4ter
2au3r2
au2s1ah
ausan8ne.
au2sau
4ausc
au4schm
1ausd
2ausen
aus3erp
au4s3erw
1ausf
1ausg
1ausl
au2so
au2spr
1ausr
1auss2
au3sse
aus4se.
au8ssende
aus4ser
au2sta
2auste
au4stec
aus3tie
aust2o
aus3tri
1ausü
1ausz
au3ße
a4ut
au2t1äu
au4ten4g
au4t3erh
1auto
au2trö
2auts
2auu
2auw
2aux
2auz
auz2w
2a1ü
2a1v
a3v4a
ava3t4
a3vi
a2vr
av2s
2a1w
awi3
awi1e
a1x
ax2am
ax2e
axi2s
2a1ya
a1yeu
aysi1
ay3t
2a1z
a3z2a3
az2i
az2o
az2u
ä1a
äand4
ä1b
ä5be
ä2b3l
äb2s
ä1che
äche1e
ächenma5
ächenmas8
ä1chi
äch3l
ä2chr
äch2sp
ä1chu
äck2e
ä1d
ä2da
ä2d1ia
ä2dr
äd2s
2ä1e
äf2e
äfe4n
äf2f3l
äf3l
äf3r
äf4ro
äf2s
äft2
äft4s
ä1g
ä5ge
äge1i
äge2ra
ä2g3l
äg2n
ä2g3r
äg4ra
äg2s
äg3sc
äg3str
1ä2gy
äh1a
2ä3he
ä1hi
ähl1a
äh3l2e
äh4l3e4be
2ähm
äh3na
äh3ne
1ähnl
2ähr
äh3ri
2äh2s
2äh3t
ä1hu
äh1w
2äi
ä1im
ä1is.
ä3isch.
ä1isk
ä1j
ä1k
ä2k3l
ä2k3r
ä1la
älbe2
äl2bl
ä5le
äl2l1a
äl2p3
äl4schl
ä1lu
ämi3en
2äml
äm2ma4
ämmas2
ämoni3e
2ämp
äm2s
ämt2e
2än.
än5de
än2dr
2äne
äne2n1
än2f5
änft2
2änge
2än2g3l
än2gr
äng3se
2ä3ni
änk2e
än2k3l
än2kr
änn4e2
äno3
2äns
än2s1c
äns2e
änse3h
2änz
ä1on
ä1pa
äp2pl
äp2pr
äp2s1c
1äq
ä2r3a2
är4af
är1ä
är2b3le
är1c
4äre
ä2r1ei
äre2n
ä2r1ene
är2gr
är1int
är2k3l
är4ment
ärme3s
är1o
ä1rö
ärse2
är2seb
är2si
ärt4e
är2th
ärt4s1
ä2rü
är2zw
ä1s
äs4c
ä3s4e
äse3g2
äser4ei
äse4ren
äser2i
äse3t
ä5si
äskop2
äskopf3
ä3s2kr
ä2s1p
ä3s2s
äs4s1c
äss2e
äss3erk
ä5sses
äs4s1t
äst2
äs2te
ä2str
ä1ß
äß1erk
ä2t1a2
ä3te
äte1i
ätein2
äte2n
ä2t2h
ä1ti
ä1to
ät1ob
ät3r
ät2sa
ät2sä
ät4schl
ät4schr
ät2s1i
äts3l
äts1p
ät2s1t
ät4s3te
ät4sti
ät2tei
ät2tr
ä1tu
ät2zw
äu2b3l
äu2br
äu1c
äude3
äu3el
ä2uf
äuf2e
1äug
äu4g3l
2äul
2äum
äu2ma
äum2s1
2ä2un
äun2e
äu1nu
2äu3r
äu1s
2ä3us.
äu4schä
äu4schm
äu3se
ä3usg
ä3usk
ä3usn
äu2s1p
äu3s2s
äuss1c
1äuß
äu2tr
4ä1v
1äx
ä1z
â1t
á1n
ba2bl
2babs
bach5t4e
backs2
b1a2dr
2b1af
bah2nu
bahr2e
bais2
ba2ka
ba2k1er
ba2k1i
bak1l
bak1r
ba2kra
3bal
bal2a
bal4lan
balle4b
bal6lerg
bal4li4g
bal4lok
bal3lö3
2b1am
ba2me
ban2a
3b2and
ban2dr
ba3n2e
b1ang
ban3gl
ban2k1a
ban4kl
ban2kr
2banl
2b1ans
ban3t
b1anz
bar3b
bar3de
ba2rei
bar2en
ba4r3ins
bar3n
bar3zw
3bas
ba3s2a
ba2sc
ba2str
ba4t3ent
bauer4l
bauer4s
bau3g
bau3s2k
bau3sp
ba1yo
3b2äc
bä1ch
b2är
b2ä4s3
4b1b
bbe4p
b4be2se
bb3ler
bb2lö
b3bru
bbru2c
bb2s
bbu1
2b1c
bch2
2b3d4
1be.
3bea
be3an
be3ar
3beb
b2ebe
1bec
be1ch
be2del
bedi4
be1eh
be1erl
be1eta
3bef4
be3g2
2b1eier
bei1f4
bei4ge.
beik4
beil2
bei3la
2b1eime
be1imm
b2ein
be1ind
be1in2h
bei3s2
beit2s
3bek
3bel
be3las
bel3d
be3lec
be3lei
be2l1en
be2let
be3li
bel3la
bel3lä
bel3li
be2l3ö
